Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1289.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.378, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Exception. new text end new text begin A person may not be charged with or convicted of a violation of this section for acts committed while pregnant and before the birth of the person's child or children including but not limited to the use of drugs, prescribed or otherwise; experiencing abuse; exposure to or being a victim of domestic or other violence; or failing to maintain optimal physical health. new text end